Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Eighty-third Legislative Assembly approves the amendments by  the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission to  OAR 213-003-0001, 213-017-0004, 213-017-0005 and
213-017-0006.
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2933 (HB 2933-A) Page 1